Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2928
Program disease, defined.

Program disease means a dangerous disease for which specific state or federal legislation exists for disease control or eradication, or is classified as a program disease by the department or USDA/APHIS/VS.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 28.